Virginia statutes. Title 10.1. Conservation.
Article 2. Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board.

§ 10.1-502.
Soil and Water Conservation Board; composition.

The Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board is continued and shall perform the functions conferred upon it in this chapter. The Board shall consist of nine nonlegislative citizen members and one ex officio member with nonvoting privileges. The Director of the Department of Conservation and Recreation or his designee shall be a nonvoting ex officio member of the Board. Three nonlegislative citizen members of the Board shall be appointed by the Governor as at-large members, of whom at least two members shall have a demonstrated interest in natural resource conservation with a background or knowledge in dam safety, soil conservation, or water quality protection. Additionally, four nonlegislative citizen members shall be farmers at the time of their appointment and two nonlegislative citizen members shall be farmers or district directors. Each of the six nonlegislative members who is a farmer or district director shall be a resident of a different one of the six geographic areas represented in the Virginia Association of Soil and Water Conservation Districts and shall be appointed by the Governor from a list of two qualified nominees for each vacancy jointly submitted by the Board and the Board of Directors of the Virginia Association of Soil and Water Conservation Districts in consultation with the Virginia Farm Bureau Federation and the Virginia Agribusiness Council. Nonlegislative citizen members shall be appointed for a term of four years. All appointed members shall not serve more than two consecutive full terms. Appointments to fill vacancies shall be made in the same manner as the original appointments, except that such appointments shall be for the unexpired terms only. The Board may invite the Virginia State Conservationist, Natural Resources Conservation Service, to serve as an advisory nonvoting member. The Board shall keep a record of its official actions and adopt a seal and may perform acts, hold public hearings, and adopt regulations necessary for the execution of its functions under this chapter.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-6; 1950, p. 77; 1954, c. 670; 1956, c. 654; 1960, c. 208; 1964, c. 512; 1968, c. 149; 1970, c. 480; 1984, c. 750; 1985, c. 448; 1988, c. 891; 1989, c. 656; 1991, c. 188; 1992, c. 121; 2003, c. 128; 2005, c. 102; 2011, cc. 213, 228; 2013, cc. 756, 793; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 43, 44.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2005, c. 102, cl. 2 provides: “That the Governor shall make new appointments for each of the three at-large members of the Board in accordance with the provisions of this act on July 1, 2005. The new appointments of the at-large members of the Board shall go into effect upon the expiration of the current members’ terms in January 2006, and the terms shall be staggered as follows: one member for a term of two years; one member for a term of three years; and one member for a term of four years. The Governor shall designate the term to be served by each appointee at the time of appointment and may reappoint the existing at-large members of the Board.”

Acts 2011, cc. 213 and 228, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act shall not be construed to affect existing appointments for which the terms have not expired. However, any new appointments made after the effective date of this act shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this act.”

For complete transition provisions related to transfer of certain water quality programs (stormwater management, erosion and sediment control, nutrient trading, and the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Areas) formerly administered by the Department of Conservation and Recreation, to the Department of Environmental Quality, see Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cls. 4 through 14, noted in full under Article 2.3 (§ 62.1-44.15:24 et seq.) of Chapter 3.1 of Title 62.1.

Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cl. 3 provides: “That the provisions of §

10.1-502

, as amended by this act, shall not be construed to affect existing appointments for which the terms have not expired. However, any new appointments or appointments to fill vacancies made after the effective date of this act shall be made in accordance with the provisions of this act.”

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 128 substituted “10” for “twelve” in the second sentence; in the third sentence, substituted “or his designee” for “the Director of the State Cooperative Extension Service, the Director of Agriculture and Life Sciences, Virginia Polytechnic Institute and State University, Research Division, the Associate Vice President for Agriculture and Extension of Virginia State University, and the State Commissioner of Agriculture and Consumer Services or their designees” and “a member” for “members”; in the fourth sentence, substituted “Three at-large members” for “One member,” and “members” for “member”; added the fifth sentence; and substituted “Natural Resources” for “Soil” in the next-to-last sentence.

The 2005 amendments.

The 2005 amendment by c. 102 deleted “to serve at the pleasure of the Governor, for a term coincident with that of the appointing Governor; vacancies in the office of such appointed members shall be filled by the Governor” following “Governor” in the fourth sentence, inserted the present fifth sentence, substituted “Additionally, four members” for “Four members” in the seventh sentence and substituted “All appointed” for “Appointed” in the eighth sentence.

The 2011 amendments.

The 2011 amendments by cc. 213 and 228 are identical, and in the second sentence, substituted “12 voting members” for “10 voting members,” in the third sentence, inserted “nonvoting ex officio,” in the fourth sentence, substituted “Six” for “Three,” in the sixth sentence, deleted “three” preceding “at-large members,” added the seventh sentence, and in the eighth sentence, inserted “jointly,” and deleted “in joint session” following “Water Conservation Board.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 756 and 793 are identical, and substituted “nine” for “12” in the second sentence, “Three” for “Six” at the beginning of the fourth sentence, and “two members shall be appointed by the Governor as at-large members and shall have” for “two of the at-large members should have” and deleted “or urban point or nonpoint source pollution control. At least three of the at-large members, by their education, training, or experience, shall be knowledgeable of stormwater management and shall be representative of business and local government interests” at the end of the sixth sentence, and made a related change; and inserted “at the time of their appointment,” “in consultation with the Virginia Farm Bureau Federation and the Virginia Agribusiness Council,” and “Virginia” in the seventh sentence; and substituted “the original appointments” for “described above” in the tenth sentence.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 43 and 44, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and rewrote the section, which read “The Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board is continued and shall perform the functions conferred upon it in this chapter. The Board shall consist of nine voting members. The Director of the Department of Conservation and Recreation, or his designee, shall be a nonvoting ex officio member of the Board. Three at-large members of the Board shall be appointed by the Governor. After the initial staggering of terms, nonlegislative citizen members shall be appointed for a term of four years. At least two members shall be appointed by the Governor as at-large members and shall have a demonstrated interest in natural resource conservation with a background or knowledge in dam safety, soil conservation, or water quality protection. Additionally, four members shall be farmers at the time of their appointment and two members shall be farmers or district directors, appointed by the Governor from a list of two qualified nominees for each vacancy jointly submitted by the Board of Directors of the Virginia Association of Soil and Water Conservation Districts, in consultation with the Virginia Farm Bureau Federation and the Virginia Agribusiness Council, and the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board, each for a term of four years. All appointed members shall not serve more than two consecutive full terms. Appointments to fill vacancies shall be made in the same manner as the original appointments, except that such appointments shall be for the unexpired terms only. The Board may invite the Virginia State Conservationist, Natural Resources Conservation Service, to serve as an advisory nonvoting member. The Board shall keep a record of its official actions, shall adopt a seal and may perform acts, hold public hearings, and promulgate regulations necessary for the execution of its functions under this chapter.”

Law Review.

For 2003/2004 survey of environmental law, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 203 (2004).

§ 10.1-503.
Administrative officer and other employees; executive committee.

The Director shall provide technical experts and other agents and employees, permanent and temporary, necessary for the execution of the functions of the Board. The Board may create an executive committee and delegate to the chairman of the Board, or to the committee or to the Director, such powers and duties as it deems proper. Upon request of the Board, for the purpose of carrying out any of its functions, the supervising officer of any state agency or of any state institution of learning shall, insofar as possible under available appropriations, and having due regard for the needs of the agency to which the request is directed, assign or detail to the Board, members of the staff or personnel of the agency or institution, and make special reports, surveys, or studies requested by the Board.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-7; 1964, c. 512; 1984, cc. 444, 750; 1988, c. 891; 2003, c. 128.

The 2003 amendments.

The 2003 amendment by c. 128 substituted “the Director” for “one or more agents or employees” in the second sentence.

§ 10.1-504.
Chairman; quorum.

The Board shall designate its chairman and may, from time to time, change such designation. Five members of the Board shall constitute a quorum, and the concurrence of a majority of those present and voting shall be required for all determinations.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-8; 1964, c. 512; 1988, c. 891; 2013, cc. 756, 793.

Editor’s note.

For complete transition provisions related to transfer of certain water quality programs (stormwater management, erosion and sediment control, nutrient trading, and the Chesapeake Bay Preservation Areas) formerly administered by the Department of Conservation and Recreation, to the Department of Environmental Quality, see Acts 2013, cc. 756 and 793, cls. 4 through 14, noted in full under Article 2.3 (§ 62.1-44.15:24 et seq.) of Chapter 3.1 of Title 62.1.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 756 and 793 are identical, and substituted “Five” for “Six” at the beginning of the second sentence.

§ 10.1-505.
Duties of Board.

In addition to other duties and powers conferred upon the Board, it shall have the following duties and powers:

To give or loan appropriate financial and other assistance to district directors in carrying out any of their powers and programs.

To keep district directors informed of the activities and experience of all other districts, and to facilitate an interchange of advice and experience between the districts.

To oversee the programs of the districts.

To secure the cooperation and assistance of the United States and any of its agencies, and of agencies of the Commonwealth, in the work of the districts.

To disseminate information throughout the Commonwealth concerning the activities and programs of the districts, and to encourage the formation of such districts in areas where their organization is desirable.

To assist persons, associations, and corporations engaged in furthering the programs of the districts; to encourage and assist in the establishment and operation of such associations and corporations, and to authorize financial assistance to the officers and members of such associations and corporations in the discharge of their duties.

To receive, review, approve or disapprove applications for assistance in planning and carrying out works of improvement under the Watershed Protection and Flood Prevention Act (Public Law 566 — 83rd Congress, as amended), and to receive, review and approve or disapprove applications for any other similar soil and water conservation programs provided in federal laws which by their terms or by related executive orders require such action by a state agency.

To advise and recommend to the Governor approval or disapproval of all work plans developed under Public Law 83-566 and Public Law 78-535 and to advise and recommend to the Governor approval or disapproval of other similar soil and water conservation programs provided in federal laws which by their terms or by related executive orders require approval or comment by the Governor.

To provide for the conservation of soil and water resources, control and prevention of soil erosion, flood water and sediment damages thereby preserving the natural resources of the Commonwealth.

To adopt regulations (i) for the operation of the voluntary nutrient management training and certification program as required by §

10.1-104.1

and (ii) that amend the application rates in the Virginia Nutrient Management Standards and Criteria as required by §

10.1-104.2:1

.

To provide, from such funds appropriated for districts, financial assistance for the administrative, operational and technical support of districts.

History.

Code 1950, § 21-10; 1956, c. 654; 1958, c. 410; 1962, c. 213; 1964, c. 512; 1970, c. 480; 1972, c. 557; 1988, c. 891; 2013, cc. 593, 658.

Editor’s note.

For the Watershed Protection and Flood Prevention Act, referred to above, see generally 16 U.S.C.S. § 1001.

Acts 2013, cc. 593 and 658, cl. 2 provides: “That the regulations adopted by the Department of Conservation and Recreation and directed for transfer from the Department of Conservation and Recreation to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board in accordance with this act shall remain in full force and effect until transferred to the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board.”

Acts 2013, cc. 593 and 658, cl. 3 provides: “That the initial actions of the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board to adopt, with necessary amendments, the nutrient management training and certification regulations transferred by this act from the Department of Conservation and Recreation to the Board shall be exempt from Article 2 (§ 2.2-4006 et seq.) of Chapter 40 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia. Such regulations shall remain in full force and effect until altered, amended, or rescinded by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board.”

Acts 2013, cc. 593 and 658, cl. 4 provides: “That after the transfer of the nutrient management training and certification program, if the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board determines that additional amendments to the regulations are necessary solely to enable implementation of the program in accordance with this act, the regulatory actions necessary shall be exempt from Article 2 (§ 2.2-4006 et seq.) of Chapter 40 of Title 2.2 of the Code of Virginia except that the Board shall provide an opportunity for public comment on the regulatory actions.”

Acts 2013, cc. 593 and 658, cl. 5 provides: “That guidance of the Department of Conservation and Recreation relating to the regulations to be transferred by this act shall remain in effect until amended or repealed.”

Acts 2013, cc. 593 and 658, cl. 6 provides: “That any regulatory action initiated prior to the effective date of this act by the Department of Conservation and Recreation to amend the regulations being transferred by this act shall be continued by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board at the time of the transfer of the regulations. Any regulatory action to amend the regulations being transferred that is initiated by the Department of Conservation and Recreation on and after the effective date of this act may be continued by the Virginia Soil and Water Conservation Board.”

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 593 and 658 are identical, and substituted “oversee the programs of the districts” for “coordinate the programs of the districts so far as this may be done by advice and consultation” in subdivision 3; and added subdivisions 10 and 11.